Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.180

Goals under RCW 19.112.170—Report—Executive request legislation.

(1) If either or both of the goals in RCW 19.112.170 are not achieved by November 30, 2008, the director shall monitor the state's diesel and gasoline fuel supply until such time as those goals, or either of them, is met.

(2) The director shall report to the governor and the legislature regarding the goals in RCW 19.112.170 by November 30th of the year in which a goal is met.

(3) Following notification under this section that a goal has been met, the governor shall prepare executive request legislation repealing RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, or both, as applicable.

[ 2006 c 338 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.